California, session 20252026, SB674.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14560 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:14560. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a beverage distributor shall pay the department, for deposit into the fund, a redemption payment of four cents ($0.04) for a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state by the distributor.(2) A beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be considered as two beverage containers for purposes of redemption payments paid pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) (A) The amount of the redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces sold or offered for sale in the state by a dealer shall equal five cents ($0.05), and the amount of redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be ten cents ($0.10), if the aggregate recycling rate reported pursuant to Section 14551 for all beverage containers subject to this division is less than 75 percent for the 12-month reporting period from January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, or for any calendar year thereafter.(B) A distributor shall not be required to pay a redemption payment pursuant to this section for a beverage container used solely to pour wine, beer, or distilled spirits sold or offered to consumers for consumption on the premises by a wine, beer, or distilled spirits tasting room licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).(4) (A) Notwithstanding Section 14511, with respect to the payment of redemption payments for beverages manufactured outside the state and sold directly to consumers within the state with a direct shipper permit, the distributor shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit issued pursuant to Section 23661.3 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be responsible for paying to the department the total redemption payment for all sales and transfers made directly to consumers in the state. If the department is unable to collect the redemption payment from the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit, the department shall give written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to that person or entity. The notice shall state that the person or entity shall not be permitted to offer that beverage brand for sale within the state. If the person or entity fails to remit the redemption payment within 30 days of issuance of the notice, the department shall notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control that the permitholder has failed to comply, and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall prohibit the offering for sale of that beverage brand within the state.(B) The department and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall enter into a contract, pursuant to Section 14536.5, concerning the implementation of this paragraph, which shall include a provision reimbursing the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for its costs incurred in implementing this paragraph. The department may expend the amount necessary for that reimbursement from the fund.(b) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state has a refund value of four cents ($0.04) if the beverage container has a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces and eight cents ($0.08) if the beverage container has a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more.(c) Commencing January 1, 2024, and notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, containing wine or distilled spirits, as described in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504, sold or offered for sale in the state shall have a redemption payment and refund value of twenty-five cents ($0.25).(d) This section does not apply to a refillable beverage container.(e)This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2026, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 14560 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:14560. (a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), a beverage distributor shall pay the department, for deposit into the fund, a redemption payment of four cents ($0.04) for a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state by the distributor.(2) A beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be considered as two beverage containers for purposes of redemption payments paid pursuant to paragraph (1).(3) (A) The amount of the redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces sold or offered for sale in the state by a dealer shall equal five cents ($0.05), and the amount of redemption payment and refund value for a beverage container with a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more shall be ten cents ($0.10), if the aggregate recycling rate reported pursuant to Section 14551 for all beverage containers subject to this division is less than 75 percent for the 12-month reporting period from January 1, 2006, to December 31, 2006, or for any calendar year thereafter.(B) A distributor shall not be required to pay a redemption payment pursuant to this section for a beverage container used solely to pour wine, beer, or distilled spirits sold or offered to consumers for consumption on the premises by a wine, beer, or distilled spirits tasting room licensed pursuant to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act (Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code).(4) (A) Notwithstanding Section 14511, with respect to the payment of redemption payments for beverages manufactured outside the state and sold directly to consumers within the state with a direct shipper permit, the distributor shall be deemed to be the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit issued pursuant to Section 23661.3 of the Business and Professions Code, and shall be responsible for paying to the department the total redemption payment for all sales and transfers made directly to consumers in the state. If the department is unable to collect the redemption payment from the person or entity named on the direct shipper permit, the department shall give written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to that person or entity. The notice shall state that the person or entity shall not be permitted to offer that beverage brand for sale within the state. If the person or entity fails to remit the redemption payment within 30 days of issuance of the notice, the department shall notify the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control that the permitholder has failed to comply, and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall prohibit the offering for sale of that beverage brand within the state.(B) The department and the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall enter into a contract, pursuant to Section 14536.5, concerning the implementation of this paragraph, which shall include a provision reimbursing the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control for its costs incurred in implementing this paragraph. The department may expend the amount necessary for that reimbursement from the fund.(b) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state has a refund value of four cents ($0.04) if the beverage container has a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces and eight cents ($0.08) if the beverage container has a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more.(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a beverage container that is a box, bladder, or pouch, or similar container, containing wine or distilled spirits, as described in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 14504, sold or offered for sale in the state shall have a redemption payment and refund value of ten cents ($0.10) if the beverage container has a capacity of less than 24 fluid ounces and twenty-five cents ($0.25) if the beverage container has a capacity of 24 fluid ounces or more.(2) A dealer shall have until January 15, 2026, to comply with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 14560.5 regarding shelf labels for a beverage that has a different redemption payment on January 1, 2026, than it had on December 31, 2025.(d) This section does not apply to a refillable beverage container.(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 42474.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:42474.5.Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter and all regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter may be enforced by DTSC pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.